Montana, session 2025, HB131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
11
12 Section 1. Section 39-51-2204, MCA, is amended to read:
13 "39-51-2204. Maximum benefit amount. (1) Any EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2), ANY
14 otherwise eligible individual is entitled during the individual's benefit year to a total amount of benefits equal to
15 the individual's weekly benefit amount, as calculated according to 39-51-2201, times the number of full weeks
16 of benefit entitlement appearing in the following table in the line which includes the individual's ratio of total
17 base period earnings to the highest quarter of earnings in the base period:
Ratio of Total Base Period
Earnings to High Quarter Full Weeks
At Least But Less Than of Benefits
1.00 1.25 8
1.25 1.50 10
1.50 1.75 12
1.75 2.00 14
2.00 2.25 16
2.25 2.50 18
2.50 2.75 20
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 131

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0131.3
2.75 3.00 22
3.00 ....... 24
1 (2) FOR JOB-ATTACHED CLAIMANTS, UNION-ATTACHED CLAIMANTS, OR CLAIMANTS THAT ARE UNEMPLOYED
2 RESULTING FROM A MASS LAYOFF AS DEFINED BY THE FEDERAL WORKER ADJUSTMENT AND RETRAINING NOTIFICATION
3 ACT, 29 U.S.C. 2101(A)(3), ANY OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL IS ENTITLED DURING THE INDIVIDUAL'S BENEFIT YEAR
4 TO A TOTAL AMOUNT OF BENEFITS EQUAL TO THE INDIVIDUAL'S WEEKLY BENEFIT AMOUNT, AS CALCULATED ACCORDING
5 TO 39-51-2201, TIMES THE NUMBER OF FULL WEEKS OF BENEFIT ENTITLEMENT APPEARING IN THE FOLLOWING TABLE IN
6 THE LINE WHICH INCLUDES THE INDIVIDUAL'S RATIO OF TOTAL BASE PERIOD EARNINGS TO THE HIGHEST QUARTER OF
7 EARNINGS IN THE BASE PERIOD:
RATIO OF TOTAL BASE PERIOD
EARNINGS TO HIGH QUARTER FULL WEEKS
AT LEAST BUT LESS THAN OF BENEFITS
1.00 1.25 8
1.25 1.50 10
1.50 1.75 12
1.75 2.00 14
2.00 2.25 16
2.25 2.50 18
2.50 2.75 20
2.75 3.00 22
3.00 ....... 24
8 "
9
10 NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1 5, 2025.
11
12 NEW SECTION. Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to unemployment insurance claims filed
13 on or after July 1 5, 2025.
14 - END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 131